Hawaii statutes.
§468M-3 Prohibited acts. No activity
desk shall engage in any of the following practices:

(1) Covering, concealing, or obscuring the name,
address, or telephone number of an activity provider in any card or brochure;

(2) Placing a telephone number, address, or other
information on any card, brochure, or other advertising material produced or
published by an activity provider, whether by decal, sticker, stamp, or
otherwise, without identifying the activity desk by name, address, and
registration number;

(3) Using a promotional card or brochure that does
not clearly display the name and telephone number of the activity provider
whose activity is being sold or booked when the activity is located in this
State;

(4) Withdrawing any funds of a consumer from a client
trust account, other than a sales commission up to a maximum of fifteen per
cent or to make a refund to the consumer, until the activity provider has been
paid;

(5) Failing to possess a current and valid
registration prior to engaging in business or advertising as an activity desk;
or

(6) Failing to obtain full payment for an activity
prior to or at the time activity reservations are booked or placed with the
activity provider or within three business days thereafter, except where the
reservation specifically provides for direct payment of the amounts owed to the
activity provider at the time of the activity. [L 1990, c 214, pt of §1, §2; am
L 1991, c 240, pt of §1, §§2, 4; ren and am L 1992, c 231, pt of §2, §§3, 6; am
L 1995, c 174, §§1, 2; am L 1998, c 248, §§1, 2; am L 2010, c 150, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next